Louisiana, session 2026, HB1193.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(35) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(35) R.S. 49:220.25, 49:214.6.11, 220.25, 975.1, 980.1, 997, 1055
* * *
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1193 ENROLLED
Section 2. R.S. 49:214.6.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§214.6.11. Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity construction phase contracts
A. The legislature declares it to be in the public interest to increase
efficiency and improve operational readiness in performing integrated coastal
protection. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, including but
not limited to the provisions of Titles 38 or 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, if the authority determines it is in the best interest of the public, the authority
may procure and award Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity (ID/IQ) construction
phase contracts pursuant to the requirements of this Section in relation to integrated
coastal protection projects and related incidental work let or to be let by the
authority. Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity contracting is a method of
contracting that allows for delivery of an indefinite quantity of services over a fixed
duration.
B. As used in this Section, the following terms shall have the following
meanings:
(1) "Best value" means a selection process in which proposals contain price
and qualitative components and award of Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity
contracts based upon a combination of price and qualitative considerations as
provided in the solicitation documents and includes any selection process authorized
by applicable federal law.
(2) "Indefinite Delivery, Indefinite Quantity construction phase contract",
or "ID/IQ construction phase contract" means the contract awarded to an ID/IQ
contractor pursuant to the requirements of this Section.
(3) "Low bid" means a selection process in which proposals are awarded
based on the proposed price from the lowest responsive and responsible bidder.
(4) "Multiple award" means an ID/IQ procurement where awards of ID/IQ
construction phase contracts for the same scope of services are made to multiple
ID/IQ contractors through a single procurement.
(5) "Single award" means an ID/IQ procurement where award of the ID/IQ
construction phase contract is made to a single ID/IQ contractor.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1193 ENROLLED
(6) "Work order" means a contract document issued for a definite scope of
work pursuant to an ID/IQ construction phase contract. A work order provides the
location, time, and scope of work required and authorizes the ID/IQ contractor to
deliver the scope of services described in the work order. It also provides required
pay items, quantities, and unit prices, as applicable.
C. Where federal law applies, the authority shall comply with all applicable
federal laws or regulations including but not limited to 48 CFR Part 16, Subpart 16.5
and 48 CFR Part 216, Subpart 216.5, as amended. In the event of a conflict between
applicable required federal laws or regulations and the provisions of Titles 38 or 49
of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, or any other Louisiana rules or
regulations, the federal laws or regulations shall control.
D. Procurements pursuant to this Section may include single award or
multiple award ID/IQ construction phase contracts. The authority may use low bid,
best value, or qualifications-based contracting methods as set forth in Subsection E
of this Section. Materials separately acquired by the authority may be provided to
contractors for use pursuant to and as a condition of any contract for an integrated
coastal protection project.
E. Procurement and award ID/IQ construction phase contracts shall meet the
following requirements:
(1)(a) Single award ID/IQ construction phase contracts awarded on a low
bid basis shall follow either the advertisement for low bid contracts set forth in R.S.
38:2212 or the requirements for advertisements set forth in this Section. If a
single-award, low-bid ID/IQ construction phase contract is advertised pursuant to
R.S. 38:2212, an award may also be made pursuant to R.S. 38:2212. If an award is
made pursuant to R.S. 38:2212, the authority shall not be required to follow the
provisions of this Subsection.
(b) Single award ID/IQ construction phase contracts awarded on a best value
basis shall follow the requirements for advertisements and the procedures set forth
in this Subsection.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1193 ENROLLED
(2) Multiple award ID/IQ construction phase contracts shall be awarded on
a qualifications basis and shall follow the requirements for advertisements and the
procedures set forth in this Subsection.
(3)(a) Prior to the award of any multiple award ID/IQ construction phase
contract or a single award ID/IQ construction phase contract not advertised pursuant
to R.S. 38:2212, the authority shall issue a "notice of intent", hereafter referred to in
this Section as "NOI", through advertisement on its designated webpage to request
letters of interest, hereafter referred to in this Section as "LOI". The NOI shall be
advertised a minimum of ten business days prior to the deadline for receipt of
responses. The NOI shall contain a description of the ID/IQ services to be procured.
The authority may additionally advertise the NOI via additional media or
publications, and may readvertise by any of the foregoing means to solicit additional
responses if the authority deems the number of responses received to be inadequate
to encourage competition.
(b)(i) After expiration of the deadline to submit an LOI for a single award
ID/IQ construction phase contract, the authority shall issue "request for proposals",
hereafter referred to in this Section as "RFP", to contractors that submit an LOI. The
RFP shall include instructions for development and submittal of proposals, a
description of how proposals shall be evaluated, and shall comply with the
requirements of this Section.
(ii) After expiration of the deadline to submit an LOI for multiple award
ID/IQ construction phase contract, the authority shall issue a request for
qualifications, hereafter referred to in this Section as "RFQ", to contractors that
submit an LOI. The RFQ shall include instructions for development and submission
of qualifications, a description of how qualifications shall be evaluated, and shall
comply with the requirements of this Section.
(c) Bid security required by R.S. 38:2218 or by the authority shall be
specified in the authority's standard specifications or special provisions. The
authority may waive the requirement for bid security for procurement under this
Section.
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1193 ENROLLED
(4)(a) The executive director shall establish an evaluation committee for
evaluation of proposals for best value single award ID/IQ construction phase
contracts and statements of qualification for multiple award ID/IQ construction
phase contracts received by the authority. The evaluation committee may be assisted
by other authority personnel and external advisors in the evaluation of such proposals
and statements of qualification.
(b) The evaluation committee shall evaluate such proposals and statements
of qualification on the basis of the criteria identified in the RFP or RFQ which may
include general and project-specific criteria, such as:
(i) Experience of the contractor and of key personnel related to the project
or type of work under consideration.
(ii) Past performance on authority projects.
(iii) Ability to obtain all bonding and insurance requirements.
(iv) Any project-specific criteria that may apply to project needs.
(c) The evaluation committee shall make a recommendation of award to the
executive director. The authority shall make the final determination of award.
(d) The proposals and statements of qualification received by the authority
and the evaluation committee's records, including the evaluations committee's
findings, grading, score sheets, and recommendations, shall not be available for
public inspection until the ID/IQ construction phase contract has been entered into
or the procurement has been cancelled. The meetings of the evaluation committee
shall not be subject to the Open Meetings Law.
(5) Prior to issuing a work order pursuant to a multiple award ID/IQ
construction phase contract, the authority shall request, in writing, bids from the
contractors awarded the contract. The authority shall issue the work order to the
lowest responsive bidder.
F. The authority may include the following items in its procurement
documents or contracts:
(1) Payment of mobilization or demobilization costs and the method for
determining mobilization and demobilization reimbursement if the authority opts to
award those costs separately from individual work orders.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1193 ENROLLED
(2) The method for determining price escalation or de-escalation procedures
when warranted by particular circumstances.
(3) Special provisions specific to the ID/IQ construction phase contract.
(4) Unit pricing or lists of work items specific to the ID/IQ construction
phase contract.
(5) A minimum dollar value of services that the authority is obligated to
order.
(6) A statement of procedures and selection criteria the authority shall use
in issuing work orders.
(7) Any other information, terms, or requirements the authority deems
necessary to include in its procurement documents or contracts.
G. The term of the initial ID/IQ construction phase contract shall not exceed
five years, but the contract may authorize extensions up to an additional five years.
The total of the initial term and any optional contract extensions shall not exceed ten
years. The duration of the initial term and the terms of individual contract extensions
shall be determined by the authority. The ID/IQ construction phase contract shall
serve as the underlying agreement that establishes the general terms and conditions
governing the relationship between the authority and the selected bidder. Execution
of the ID/IQ construction phase contract shall not authorize work or serve as a notice
to proceed.
H. Performance bonds under R.S. 38:2216 shall apply to the value and
completion of work under an individual work order rather than the value and
completion of all work under the ID/IQ construction phase contract unless otherwise
specified in the ID/IQ construction phase contract or the individual work order, or
otherwise provided in a special provision. The requirement of issuance of
performance bonds shall be at the time of execution of an individual work order
unless otherwise specified by the ID/IQ construction phase contract , the individual
work order, or a special provision developed by the authority. Stipulated damages
apply to individual work orders and shall be calculated by the required completion
Page 6 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1193 ENROLLED
date of an individual work order. Insurance policies and the extent and type of
coverage required shall be as determined by the authority.
I.(1) This Section shall not apply to architect and engineer service contracts
or other consulting contracts of the authority authorized by Chapter 10 of Title 38 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, Chapter 17 of Title 39 of the Louisiana
Revised Statutes of 1950, or to projects governed by 48 CFR Parts 36 and 236,
except that architect and engineer services may be included in these contracts to the
extent that they support the construction phase of projects.
(2) This Section shall not apply to design-build contracting.
J. Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the provisions of Titles 38
and 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 shall apply to ID/IQ construction
phase contracts. In the event of a conflict, the provisions of this Section shall prevail
and shall supersede any conflicting provision of state law.
K. The authority may promulgate rules and regulations to implement and
enforce the provisions of this Section in accordance with the provisions of the
Administrative Procedure Act.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 7 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.